Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-1509
Computation of time.

If the date for filing or completion of an act under the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the next business day shall be the deadline for filing or completing the act.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 16.
July 19, 2018